Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1233.
do enact as follows:AB1233,11Section 1. 48.227 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 48.227 (2) (a) and 2amended to read:AB1233,2,8348.227 (2) (a) Any person who operates a home under sub. (1) and licensed 4under s. 48.48 or 48.75, when engaged in sheltering a runaway child without the 5consent of the child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian, shall notify the intake 6worker of the presence of the child in the home within 12 72 hours. The If it is in 7the best interest of the child, the intake worker shall notify the parent, guardian, 8and legal custodian as soon as possible of the child’s presence in that home.AB1233,2,129(c) A hearing shall be held under sub. (4). The child shall not be removed from 10the home except with the approval of the court under sub. (4). This subsection does 11not prohibit the parent, guardian, or legal custodian from conferring with the child 12or the person operating the home.AB1233,213Section 2. 48.227 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB1233,3,51448.227 (2) (b) If it is in the best interest of the child, no later than 6 hours 1after the child enters the home under sub. (1), the person who operates the home 2shall notify the parent, guardian, and legal custodian of the child’s presence in the 3home. If the parent, guardian, and legal custodian cannot be reached for the 4purpose of notification, the person who operates the home shall attempt to reach 5them for that purpose at least every 6 hours until successful.AB1233,36Section 3. 48.227 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1233,3,14748.227 (4) (a) If the child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not 8consent to the temporary care and housing of the child at the runaway home as 9provided under sub. (2) or (3), a hearing shall be held on the issue by the judge or a 10circuit court commissioner within 24 hours of the time that the intake worker is 11notified under sub. (2) (a) that the child entered the runaway home, excluding 12Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. The intake worker shall notify the child 13and the child’s parent, guardian or, and legal custodian of the time, place, and 14purpose of the hearing.AB1233,3,1515